Louisiana, session 2026, HB702.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 45:201.6(A), (B)(2), and (C)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§201.6. Requirements for insurance
A. A transportation network company driver or a transportation network
company on the driver's behalf shall maintain primary automobile insurance,
including liability, uninsured motorist, and underinsured motorist coverage, that
meets the requirements of this Section.
B. Automobile insurance during the pre-trip acceptance period shall:
* * *
(2) Include uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage to the extent
required by R.S. 22:1295 in an amount not less than the limits of bodily injury
provided by the policy.
C. Automobile insurance during a prearranged ride shall:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-963 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 702
(2) Include uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage to the extent
required by R.S. 22:1295 in an amount not less than the limits of bodily injury
provided by the policy.
* * *